Idaho, session 2025, H0331.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-5218, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-5218. PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL FACILITIES PROGRAM. (1) Legislative
intent. It is the intent of the legislature, in recognition that providing
Idaho students with a thorough education is an essential public purpose of
the state, to support public charter schools by providing a mechanism to
obtain favorable financing on bonds so that less money is obligated toward
interest payments and more money remains in public charter schools for the
benefit of Idaho's students. There is hereby created the public charter
school facilities program to assist qualifying charter schools in obtaining
favorable financing on bonds for facility improvements and construction.
(2) Eligibility. A public charter school seeking to use the public
charter school facilities program must shall receive approval from the Idaho
housing and finance association pursuant to requirements for issuance of
nonprofit facility bonds and to satisfaction of the criteria set forth in
this section. To qualify, a public charter school must shall submit the fol-
lowing documentation to the Idaho housing and finance association:
(a) A letter of commitment from one (1) of the following:
(i) A national or state-chartered financial institution;
(ii) A community development financial institution; or
(iii) A qualified underwriter or an investment firm;
(b) Evidence that the public charter school has been in academic, op-
erational, and financial good standing according to its authorizer for
each of the previous three (3) years;
(c) Annual budgets and cash flow statements projecting that the cost
to operate the proposed facility, including future debt service, future
occupancy cost, and facility operating expenses, will not exceed twenty
percent (20%) of ongoing revenues;
(d) Evidence that the school has operating reserves greater than sixty
(60) days of cash on hand and a debt service coverage ratio equal to or
greater than one and two-tenths (1.2);
(e) An audit opinion or opinions demonstrating:
(i) An unqualified audit opinion, or a qualified opinion quali-
fied only on the basis of not reporting the actuarial value of the
PERSI sick leave plan pursuant to statement no. 45 of the govern-
mental accounting standards board;


(ii) An audit devoid of significant findings and conditions, ma-
terial weakness, or significant internal control weakness; and
(iii) An audit that does not include a going concern disclosure in
the notes or an explanatory paragraph within the audit report for
three (3) consecutive years;
(f) Certification from a public charter school's board chair or trea-
surer that projected future budgets and cash flows are based on reason-
able assumptions related to level or increasing projected enrollment or
waitlist and projected total income, including any matching funds and
donations contingent on receipt of a loan under this section;
(g) Evidence of strong academic results, including above-state average
growth or proficiency on the Idaho standards achievement test. A public
charter school with enrollment comprised of one hundred percent (100%)
at-risk students as defined by section 33-1001(3), Idaho Code, is ex-
empt from this requirement; and
(h) Any additional information requested by the Idaho housing and fi-
nance association.
(3) Approval to participate. Upon receipt of documentation satisfy-
ing the criteria set forth in subsection (2) of this section, the Idaho hous-
ing and finance association shall notify the public charter school and the
state treasurer that the school has been approved to participate in the pub-
lic charter school facilities program if:
(a) The public charter school complies with the requirements set forth
in subsection (4) of this section; and
(b) The public charter school's participation would not cause a viola-
tion of the limitations set forth in subsection (8) of this section.
Additional requirements and security interests may be imposed by agreement
of the school and bondholder or trustee.
(4) Restricted debt service reserve account.
(a) A school participating in the public charter school facilities pro-
gram shall agree to have deposited a minimum of twelve (12) months' pay-
ment on principal and interest in a restricted debt service reserve ac-
count established and held by the bondholder or trustee.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, money in a
participating public charter school's restricted debt service reserve
account may not be withdrawn if the amount withdrawn would reduce the
level of money in the account to less than twelve (12) months' payment on
principal and interest.
(c) As long as applicable bonds issued under the facilities program re-
main outstanding, money in a restricted debt service reserve account
may be withdrawn in an amount that would reduce the level to less than
twelve (12) months' payment on principal and interest, if the money is
withdrawn for the purpose of:
(i) Paying the principal, redemption price, or interest on a bond
when due if the state payments intercepted pursuant to subsection
(5) of this section, plus funded grants and other revenues pledged
by the participating public charter school for payment of the
bond, are insufficient to make the payment; or


(ii) Paying any redemption premium required to be paid when the
bonds are redeemed prior to maturity if no bonds will remain out-
standing.
(5) Intercept. As a requirement to participate in the public charter
school facilities program, a participating public charter school shall pro-
vide a directive to the Idaho department of education that all payments to
the school pursuant to the state educational support program shall be paid
directly to the bond trustee to set aside funds in accordance with the bond
indenture. All remaining funds shall be forwarded to the public charter
school. The payment directive required in this subsection may not be revoked
or amended.
(6) Public charter school facilities program fund. There is hereby es-
tablished in the state treasury the public charter school facilities program
fund, which shall consist of moneys made available through appropriations,
fees, grants, gifts, or any other source to fulfill the purposes of this sec-
tion. Moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated for the pur-
poses of this section and shall only be expended only for the purposes stated
herein. Any interest earned on the investment of idle moneys in the pub-
lic charter school facilities program fund shall be returned to the public
charter school facilities program fund. Schools participating in the public
charter school facilities program shall pay a onetime fee in an amount equal
to one-half percent (0.5%) of par at the time of issuance and an annual fee
in an amount equal to seventy-five thousandths percent (0.075%) on the out-
standing balance, which shall be deposited in the public charter school fa-
cilities program fund.
(7) Nonpayment.
(a) If a public charter school participating in the public charter
school facilities program has defaulted on its obligation to pay, a draw
on its restricted debt service reserve account shall be made, then the
following shall occur:
(i) The bond trustee shall exercise its remedies under the bond
indenture and loan agreement.
(ii) Within ten (10) days following the withdrawal from the re-
stricted debt service account, the bondholder or trustee shall no-
tify the Idaho housing and finance association, the state trea-
surer, and the state controller of the shortfall in the school's
restricted debt service reserve account.
(iii) Within fifteen (15) days of the notice provided pursuant to
subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the controller shall trans-
fer, from the public charter school facilities program fund set
forth in subsection (6) of this section, to the public school in-
come fund and then to the school's restricted debt service reserve
account an amount equal to one (1) month's interest on the bonds
based on the interest payments for which the draw on the restricted
debt service reserve account occurred. Moneys transferred to the
public school income fund pursuant to this subparagraph shall be
continuously appropriated for such purposes.
(iv) By December 1 of each year, the treasurer shall submit to
the governor a letter certifying the amount, if any, required to
restore amounts on deposit in the restricted debt service reserve


accounts of participating public charter schools and the public
charter school facilities program fund. The governor shall send
to the legislature a statement of the expenditure of moneys from
the public charter school facilities program fund as specified
in section 8, article IV of the Idaho constitution and report the
amount needed to restore funds in the restricted debt service
reserve accounts to the amount required in subsection (4)(b) of
this section. The legislature may appropriate money to restore
amounts on deposit in the restricted debt service reserve account
of a defaulting public charter school to the amounts required in
subsection (4)(b) of this section or to redeem all outstanding
bonds issued for a defaulting public charter school, the source of
which may be the public charter school facilities program fund or
any other available funds. The legislature may also appropriate
money to restore amounts withdrawn from the public charter school
facilities program fund.
(b) Repayment. If money has been withdrawn from the public charter
school facilities program fund pursuant to paragraph (a) of this sub-
section, the school shall repay the fund from the school's allocation of
facilities funds pursuant to section 33-5208(5), Idaho Code, at a time
agreed to by the superintendent of public instruction over a period of
years until the amount so withdrawn has been repaid to the public char-
ter school facilities program fund, as long as the repayment does not
cause an event of default on a facility lease or loan.
(8) Limitations.
(a) Bonds issued for the benefit of public charter schools using the
public charter school facilities program shall not be indebtedness of
the state, but are special obligations payable solely from:
(i) Revenues or other funds pledged by the qualifying public
charter school; and
(ii) Amounts appropriated by the legislature pursuant to subsec-
tion (7) of this section.
(b) The Idaho housing and finance association may not use the pub-
lic charter school facilities program when issuing bonds for a public
charter school under the facilities program if the total par amount out-
standing under the facilities program as of the proposed closing date
of the bonds to be issued, plus the par amount of the bonds to be issued,
would exceed the percentage of all Idaho public school students at-
tending public charter schools as of July 15 of the prior calendar year
multiplied by two (2) and then multiplied by the par amount of the bonds
guaranteed under the Idaho school bond guaranty act as of June 30 of the
prior calendar year cause the maximum aggregate annual debt service of
all bonds outstanding under the facilities program to exceed the amount
in the public charter school facilities program fund.
(c) Bonds issued under the public charter school facilities program
shall not be subordinate to any other obligations used to finance the
same project.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.